Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1650
Chief Water Officer; enforcement; powers.

(1) The Chief Water Officer may take any administrative or legal action necessary for the enforcement of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.

(2) An action or proceeding under this section may be initiated whenever any owner or any person acting as an agent of any owner:

(a) Fails to comply with the requirements imposed by the act or by any application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the Chief Water Officer under the act; or

(b) Commits or allows the commission of violations of the act or of any application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the Chief Water Officer under the act.

(3) Any action or proceeding under this section shall be initiated either administratively or in a court in a jurisdiction in which:

(a) The dam, area of hazard potential, or some part thereof exists;

(b) The person named in the complaint has its principal place of business; or

(c) The person named in the complaint resides.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 288.